Hawaii statutes.
§142-3.5 Authority to contract or
rent facilities. The board of agriculture may contract with third parties
for the use or rental of the division of animal industry's property or
facilities; provided that:

(1) The board determines the property or facilities
are not required for use by the division of animal industry during the term of
use by the third party;

(2) The property or facilities shall be leased or
rented at a reasonable lease rent as determined by the board of agriculture;

(3) The property or facilities shall be used for
animal welfare, including emergency shelters for animals, or other commercial purposes;
and

(4) The property or facilities shall be used only by
the third party.

Revenues generated by the use or rental of the
division of animal industry's property or facilities, including the animal
quarantine property or facilities shall be deposited into the animal industry
special fund, established pursuant to section 142‑3.6, and used to defray
the operational costs of the department of agriculture's division of animal
industry. [L 2005, c 161, §2; am L 2008, c 109, §1; am L 2011, c 185, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next